Mississippi statutes. Title 23. Elections
Article 5. Absentee Balloting Procedures Law
[Repealed].

§§ 23-9-401 through 23-9-431.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 1986, ch. 495, § 341, eff from and after January 1, 1987.

§§23-9-401 through23-9-425. [Codes, 1942, §§ 3203-401 to 3203-404; Laws, 1972, ch. 490, §§ 401 to 404]

§23-9-427. [Codes, 1942, § 3203-405; Laws, 1972, ch. 490, § 405; Laws, 1984, ch. 401, § 3]

§§23-9-429 and23-9-431. [Codes, 1942, §§ 3203-406, 3203-407; Laws, 1972, ch. 490, §§ 406, 407]